Washington statutes.
RCW 19.335.040

Application of chapter.

Nothing in this chapter applies to officers, employees, or volunteers of the state, of any county, city, or other political subdivision, or of a federal agency of the United States, who are acting in their official capacity.

[ 2014 c 67 s 5.]